Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 12. Offenses, Penalties and Enforcement
§ 31-5-1214.
Record of traffic cases; reports of convictions.

Every judge of a court shall keep or cause to be kept a record of every traffic complaint, traffic citation or other legal form of traffic charge deposited with or presented to the court and shall keep a record of every official action by the court in reference thereto, including but not limited to a record of every conviction, forfeiture of bail, judgment of acquittal and the amount of fine or forfeiture resulting from every traffic complaint or citation deposited with or presented to the court.

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, within ten (10) days after the conviction or forfeiture of bail of a person upon a charge of violating any provisions of this act or other law regulating the operation of vehicles on highways every clerk of the court of record in which the conviction was had or bail was forfeited shall prepare and immediately forward to the department an abstract of the court record covering the case in which the person was so convicted or forfeited bail, which abstract must be certified by the person required to prepare the same to be true and correct. Report need not be made of any conviction involving the illegal parking or standing of a vehicle.

The abstract must be made upon a form furnished by the department and shall include the name and address of the party charged, the number, if any, of his driver’s license, the registration number of the vehicle involved, the nature of the offense, the date of hearing, the plea, the judgment or whether bail forfeited and the amount of the fine or forfeiture as the case may be.

Every court of record shall also forward a like report to the department upon the conviction of any person of manslaughter or other felony in the commission of which a vehicle was used.

The failure, refusal or neglect of any judicial officer to comply with any of the requirements of this section constitutes misconduct in office and is grounds for removal therefrom.

The department shall keep all abstracts received hereunder at its main office and the abstracts shall be open to public inspection during reasonable business hours.

Upon implementation of a case management system in a circuit court or district court, the supreme court shall, on behalf of the circuit court or district court, furnish the abstract of the court record required under this section to the department. The abstract furnished under this section shall include the information required in W.S. 7-19-107(k).

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 225, § 160; C.S. 1945, § 60-760; W.S. 1957, § 31-247; Laws 1984, ch. 48, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2020 ch. 4, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to numbers assigned to drivers' licenses, see §

31-7-115

.

As to records to be kept by motor vehicle division, see §

31-7-120

.

As to reporting of convictions by courts to motor vehicle division, see §

31-7-126

.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), deleted “justice of the peace or” preceding “judge of a court”; and in (b) deleted “justice of peace of the court or” following “vehicles on highways every.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b), added “Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section” and substituted “court record” for “record of the court”; and added (g).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 31-5-102(a)(lix).

Cited

in

McCord v. DOT, Bureau of Driver Licensing, 834 A.2d 1257, 2003 Pa. Commw. LEXIS 776 (2003)